Utah statutes.
75-7-817.   Marital deduction formulas -- Trusts.

(1)  For estates of decedents dying after December 31, 1981, where a decedent's trust executed before September 13, 1981, contains a formula expressly providing that the decedent's spouse is to receive the maximum amount of property qualifying for the marital deduction allowable by federal law, this formula shall be construed as referring to the unlimited marital deduction allowable by federal law as amended by Section 403(a) of the Economic Recovery Tax Act of 1981.

(2)  The intention of a trustor as expressed in the trust shall control the legal effect of any dispositions made by it for purposes of construing Subsection (1), and the rule of construction of Subsection (1) shall apply unless a contrary intention is indicated by the trust.

